en: Rugby Protective Gear
xx: Rugby Protective Gear
cs: Ragbyové chrániče
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til rugby
de: Rugby-Schutzkleidung
es: Equipamiento de protección para rugby
fr: Protections de rugby
it: Protezioni per rugby
ja: ラグビー用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor rugby
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr til rugby
pl: Ochraniacze do rugby
pt: Equipamento de proteção para rúgbi
ru: Защитная экипировка для регби
sv: Skyddsutrustning för rugby
tr: Ragbi Koruyucu Kıyafetleri

en: Rugby Headgear
xx: Rugby Headgear
cs: Ragbyové chrániče hlavy
da: Rugbyhjelme
de: Rugby-Helme
es: Cascos de rugby
fr: Casques de rugby
it: Caschi da rugby
ja: ラグビー用ヘッドギア
nl: Rugbyhelmen
no: Rugbyhjelmer
pl: Kaski do rugby
pt: Capacetes de rúgbi
ru: Шлемы для регби
sv: Rugbyhjälmar
tr: Ragbi Kaskları

en: Rugby Training Aids
xx: Rugby Training Aids
cs: Ragbyové tréninkové pomůcky
da: Træningsudstyr til rugby
de: Rugby-Trainingsausrüstung
es: Equipo de entrenamiento de rugby
fr: Matériel d'entraînement de rugby
it: Attrezzatura allenamento rugby
ja: ラグビー練習器具
nl: Benodigdheden voor rugbytraining
no: Treningsutstyr til rugby
pl: Sprzęt treningowy do rugby
pt: Equipamentos de treinamento de rúgbi
ru: Тренировочное оборудование для регби
sv: Träningsutrustning för rugby
tr: Ragbi Eğitim Ekipmanları

en: Soccer
xx: Soccer
cs: Kopaná
da: Fodbold
de: Fußball
es: Fútbol
fr: Football
it: Calcio
ja: サッカー用品
nl: Voetbal
no: Fotball
pl: Piłka nożna
pt: Futebol
ru: Товары для футбола
sv: Fotboll
tr: Futbol

en: Soccer Balls
xx: Soccer Balls
cs: Fotbalové míče
da: Foldbolde
de: Fußbälle
es: Balones de fútbol
fr: Ballons de football
it: Palloni da calcio
ja: サッカーボール
nl: Voetballen
no: Fotballer
pl: Piłki do gry w piłkę nożną
pt: Bolas de futebol
ru: Футбольные мячи
sv: Fotbollar
tr: Futbol Topları

en: Soccer Corner Flags
xx: Soccer Corner Flags
cs: Rohové praporky
da: Fodbold – hjørneflag
de: Eckfahnen
es: Banderines de córner
fr: Drapeaux de corner
it: Bandierine per angoli
ja: サッカー用コーナーフラッグ
nl: Hoekvlaggen
no: Fotballhjørneflagg
pl: Chorągiewki narożne na boisko
pt: Bandeirinhas de escanteio
ru: Угловые флажки
sv: Fotbollshörnflaggor
tr: Futbol Korner Bayrakları

en: Soccer Gloves
xx: Soccer Gloves
cs: Brankářské rukavice
da: Målmandshandsker
de: Torwarthandschuhe
es: Guantes de portero de fútbol
fr: Gants de gardien de buts de football
it: Guantoni da portiere da calcio
ja: ゴールキーパー用グローブ
nl: Keepershandschoenen
no: Fotballhansker
pl: Rękawice bramkarskie
pt: Luvas do goleiro de futebol
ru: Вратарские футбольные перчатки
sv: Fotbollshandskar
tr: Futbol Eldivenleri

en: Soccer Goal Accessories
xx: Soccer Goal Accessories
cs: Potřeby pro fotbalové branky
da: Fodboldmål – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Fußballtore
es: Accesorios para porterías de fútbol
fr: Accessoires pour buts de football
it: Accessori per porte per calcio
ja: サッカーゴール関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor voetbaldoelen
no: Fotballmåltilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do bramek do piłki nożnej
pt: Acessórios para traves de futebol
ru: Принадлежности для футбольных ворот
sv: Tillbehör till fotbollsmål
tr: Futbol Kalesi Aksesuarları

en: Soccer Goals
xx: Soccer Goals
cs: Fotbalové branky a sítě
da: Fodboldmål
de: Fußballtore & -netze
es: Porterías de fútbol
fr: Buts et filets de football
it: Porte e reti da calcio
ja: サッカーゴール
nl: Voetbaldoelen en -netten
no: Fotballmål
pl: Bramki do piłki nożnej
pt: Redes e goleiras de futebol
ru: Футбольные ворота
sv: Fotbollsmål
tr: Futbol Kaleleri

en: Soccer Protective Gear
xx: Soccer Protective Gear
cs: Fotbalové chrániče
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til fodbold
de: Fußball-Schutzkleidung
es: Equipamiento de protección para fútbol
fr: Protections de football
it: Protezioni per calcio
ja: サッカー用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor voetbal
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for fotball
pl: Odzież ochronna do piłki nożnej
pt: Equipamento de proteção para futebol
ru: Защитная экипировка для футбола
sv: Skyddsutrustning för fotboll
tr: Futbol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri

en: Soccer Shin Guards
xx: Soccer Shin Guards
cs: Fotbalové holenní chrániče
da: Fodbold – benbeskyttere
de: Fußballschienbeinschützer
es: Espinilleras de fútbol
fr: Protège-tibias de football, Protège-tibia
it: Parastinchi da calcio
ja: サッカー用レガース
nl: Scheenbeschermers
no: Fotball-leggbeskyttere
pl: Piłkarskie ochraniacze goleni
pt: Caneleiras de futebol
ru: Средства защиты голеней для футбола
sv: Benskydd för fotboll
tr: Futbol İncik Kemiği Koruyucuları

en: Team Handball
xx: Team Handball
cs: Týmová házená
da: Håndbold
de: Handball
es: Balonmano
fr: Handball
it: Pallamano in squadra
ja: ハンドボール用品
nl: Teamhandbal
no: Håndball
pl: Piłka ręczna
pt: Handebol
ru: Товары для командного гандбола
sv: Handboll
tr: Takım Hentbolu

en: Handballs
xx: Handballs
cs: Míče na házenou
da: Håndbolde
de: Handbälle
es: Balones de balonmano
fr: Ballons de handball
it: Palloni da pallamano
ja: ハンドボール
nl: Handballen
no: Håndballer
pl: Piłki do piłki ręcznej
pt: Bolas de handebol
ru: Мячи для гандбола
sv: Handbollar
tr: Hentbol Topları

en: Tennis
xx: Tennis
cs: Tenis
da: Tennis
de: Tennis
es: Tenis
fr: Tennis
it: Tennis
ja: テニス用品
nl: Tennis
no: Tennis
pl: Tenis
pt: Tênis
ru: Товары для тенниса
sv: Tennis
tr: Tenis

en: Tennis Ball Hoppers & Carts
xx: Tennis Ball Hoppers & Carts
cs: Sběrače a koše na tenisové míčky
da: Tennisboldkurve
de: Tennisballkörbe & -wagen
es: Cestos recogepelotas
fr: Paniers de tennis ramasse-balles
it: Cestelli e carrelli per palline da tennis
ja: テニスボールかご
nl: Tennisbalhoppers en -mandjes
no: Kurver og vogner for tennisballer
pl: Kosze i wózki na piłki tenisowe
pt: Cestos e carrinhos para bolas de tênis
ru: Корзины и тележки для теннисных мячей
sv: Tennisbollkorgar
tr: Tenis Topu Sepetleri ve Arabaları

en: Tennis Ball Machines
xx: Tennis Ball Machines
cs: Odpalovače tenisových míčků
da: Tennisboldmaskiner
de: Tennisballwurfmaschinen
es: Lanzador de pelotas de tenis
fr: Lanceurs de balles de tennis
it: Lanciapalle da tennis
ja: テニスボール打ち出し機
nl: Tennisbalkanonnen
no: Tennisballmaskiner
pl: Maszyny wyrzucające piłki
pt: Lançadores de bolas de tênis
ru: Машины для запуска теннисных мячей
sv: Tennisbollmaskiner
tr: Tenis Topu Makineleri

en: Tennis Ball Savers
xx: Tennis Ball Savers
cs: Pouzdra na tenisové míčky
da: Tennisboldbeholdere
de: Tennisballdosen
es: Bote de pelotas de tenis
fr: Boîtes de balles de tennis
it: Barattolo palline da tennis
ja: テニスボールセーバー
nl: Drukhouder voor gasgevulde tennisballen
no: Tennisballrør
pl: Opakowania na piłki tenisowe
pt: Tubos de bolas de tênis
ru: Модули хранения теннисных мячей
sv: Tennisbollsbehållare med tryck
tr: Tenis Topu Kutuları

en: Tennis Balls
xx: Tennis Balls
cs: Tenisové míčky
da: Tennisbolde
de: Tennisbälle
es: Pelotas de tenis
fr: Balles de tennis, Balle de tennis
it: Palline da tennis
ja: テニスボール
nl: Tennisballen
no: Tennisballer
pl: Piłki tenisowe
pt: Bolas de tênis
ru: Теннисные мячи
sv: Tennisbollar
tr: Tenis Topları

en: Tennis Nets
xx: Tennis Nets
cs: Tenisové sítě
da: Tennisnet
de: Tennisnetze
es: Redes de tenis
fr: Filets de tennis
it: Reti da tennis
ja: テニスネット
nl: Tennisnetten
no: Tennisnett
pl: Siatki tenisowe
pt: Redes de tênis
ru: Теннисные сетки
sv: Tennisnät
tr: Tenis Fileleri

en: Tennis Racquet Accessories
xx: Tennis Racquet Accessories
cs: Tenisové rakety – příslušenství
da: Tennisketsjer – tilbehør
de: Tennisschlägerzubehör
es: Accesorios para raquetas de tenis
fr: Accessoires pour raquettes de tennis
it: Accessori per racchette da tennis
ja: テニスラケット関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor tennisrackets
no: Tilbehør til tennisracketer
pl: Akcesoria do rakiet tenisowych
pt: Acessórios para raquetes de tênis
ru: Принадлежности для теннисных ракеток
sv: Tillbehör till tennisracketar
tr: Tenis Raketi Aksesuarları